Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1517
Records; other indices.

The register of deeds shall keep indices showing all mortgages, including documents provided for in subdivision (a)(1) of section 9-501, Uniform Commercial Code, and discharges thereof left for record, and entitled to be recorded, in the same form as is required for deeds. He or she shall also keep a separate index to the volumes of construction lien records and to the volumes of miscellaneous records.

Laws 1885, c. 41, § 11, p. 224;

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 13, p. 368;

R.S.1913, § 5632;

C.S.1922, § 4959;

C.S.1929, § 26-1217;

R.S.1943, § 23-1517;

Laws 1969, c. 167, § 1, p. 743;

Laws 1999, LB 550, § 1.